Utah statutes.
19-5-114.   Spills or discharges of oil or other substance -- Notice to director.

Any person who spills or discharges any oil or other substance which may cause the pollution of the waters of the state shall immediately notify the director of the spill or discharge, any containment procedures undertaken, and a proposed procedure for cleanup and disposal, in accordance with rules of the board.



Amended by Chapter 360, 2012 General Session

